Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Yes In


God’s Backyard Act”.


B. 1. It is the policy of this state, in order to address


housing shortages and enhance affordability of housing, to authorize


faith-based organizations to develop affordable housing as a use-by-


right on properties owned by such organizations.

Req. No. 2761 Page 1


2. This act aims to leverage underutilized properties owned by


faith-based organizations for community benefit by increasing


housing access, reducing regulatory barriers, and promoting mixed-


use community-focused development.


3. The approval of projects under the provisions of this act


are to be made based on objective and transparent standards,


ensuring both operational flexibility for faith-based organizations


and alignment with local housing needs.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 38-150 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Active ground floor” means a portion of the ground floor of


a structure dedicated to public-facing or commercial uses,


including, but not limited to, retail spaces, restaurants, or


community centers;


2. “Affordable housing” means housing units designated for


households earning no more than eighty percent (80%) of the Area


Median Income (AMI), as defined by the United States Department of


Housing and Urban Development (HUD) income limits and rent schedules


that are mandated to maintain affordability restrictions for a


minimum period of thirty (30) years;





Req. No. 2761 Page 2


3. “Ancillary uses” means additional uses within eligible


developments that support and complement the primary mission of the


faith-based organization, including, but not limited to:


a. child care,


b. social services,


c. educational spaces, and


d. small-scale commercial spaces, including, but not


limited to, bookstores, cafés, or food distribution


centers, that are less than or equal to three thousand


(3,000) square feet in area;


4. “Development site” means land owned, leased, or controlled


by a faith-based organization that is eligible for residential,


commercial, or mixed-use development. This term includes sites


located in an area zoned for single-family, duplex, commercial,


office, institutional, civic, and multifamily zones, but does not


include sites in an area zoned for light and heavy industrial use


unless residential uses are specifically permitted by such zoning;


5. “Faith-based organization” means a religious institution,


including a church, temple, mosque, synagogue, or religious higher


education institution, that directly owns or leases a development


site involved in a project;


6. “Housing unit” means a residential dwelling, including an


apartment, townhome, or single-family residence, that is intended



Req. No. 2761 Page 3


for use by one household and provides such household with areas for


living, sleeping, cooking, and sanitation;


7. “Mature trees” means trees on a development site that have


either:


a. a minimum trunk diameter of twelve (12) inches


measured at four and one-half (4 1/2) feet above


ground level, or


b. a height of thirty-five (35) feet or more above ground


level;


8. “Ministerial review” means a nondiscretionary approval


process based on whether a project is eligible under the provisions


of this act and on objective planning and zoning standards, not


including public hearings or subjective local review. If a


municipality does not have planning or zoning standards, such


approval process shall only be based on whether a project is


eligible under the provisions of this act;


9. “Mixed-use development” means a project that includes both a


residential use and an ancillary use;


10. “Net habitable square feet” means the total floor area of a


building that is finished, heated, and fully enclosed. Such term


shall not be construed to include spaces including, but not limited


to, garages, parking areas, or unfinished attics or basements;





Req. No. 2761 Page 4


11. “Project” means any proposed residential, commercial, or


mixed-use development, construction, or renovation undertaken by a


faith-based organization on an eligible development site;


12. “Public benefit incentive” means an additional allowance or


bonus granted to a project in exchange for providing public


benefits, such as affordable housing, community services, or the


preservation of mature trees;


13. “Serviced lot” means a legal parcel of land connected to


both municipal water and sewer systems in a manner that enables


higher-density development and reduces environmental constraints;


14. “Setback” means the minimum distance required between a


building and the front, rear, and sides of the boundaries of a


property, as specified by local zoning regulations, to ensure space


for public infrastructure, privacy, and emergency access; and


15. “Steep slope” means any land area with a rise of ten (10)


feet or more over a horizontal distance of twenty-five (25) feet,


with an inclination of at least forty percent (40%), that requires


additional stabilization measures during development.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 38-151 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A faith-based organization may apply for approval to


construct a project on a development site located within a



Req. No. 2761 Page 5


municipality. Such organization shall demonstrate that such


project:


1. Shall be controlled or operated by the faith-based


organization, through either direct ownership or a long-term lease


of no less than fifty-five (55) years;


2. Is located on a development site allowing for the proposed


usage of such project;


3. Complies with all applicable building, fire, health, and


safety codes;


4. Complies with nondiscrimination rules as defined by the


federal Fair Housing Act; and


5. Has designated all properties or units for residential use


as affordable housing. Up to forty percent (40%) of properties or


units for residential use may not be designated as affordable


housing if such properties or units are to be reserved exclusively


for:


a. on-site managers,


b. security personnel, or


c. staff employed by the faith-based organization or


religious personnel, such as clergy, who require on-


site or nearby housing to fulfill their roles.


B. 1. A faith-based organization that seeks to apply for


approval for mixed-use development shall demonstrate that such


development shall include a combination of residential and ancillary

Req. No. 2761 Page 6


uses. A minimum of sixty percent (60%) of the net habitable square


feet of such proposed development shall be designated for


residential use.


2. A faith-based organization that seeks to apply for a project


that includes an ancillary use shall demonstrate that any property


designated for ancillary use shall be accessible from an active


ground floor, with at least one entrance every fifty (50) feet along


the primary street frontage of such property.


3. A project on a development site located within a floodplain


area shall be subject to a full flood risk assessment, demonstrating


that such construction will not substantially increase flood risks


or disrupt natural water flows. Compliance with the flood


management standards of the Federal Emergency Management Agency and


this state, including elevation and flood-proofing requirements,


shall be mandatory.


4. A project on a development site located in a steep slope


area shall be subject to a geotechnical analysis to assess and


address potential erosion and landslide risks. The faith-based


organization applying for such project shall demonstrate the


intention to implement stabilization measures, including retaining


walls and drainage systems, as necessary to ensure slope stability.


C. 1. A municipality shall approve or disapprove a project


within fifteen (15) days of the submission of an application for


approval by a faith-based organization. The municipality shall

Req. No. 2761 Page 7


review such application by subjecting such to ministerial review,


with objective standards applied to expedite approvals without


discretionary oversight.


2. Any and all building permit reviews, inspections, and


approvals for a project shall be conducted by the municipality


concurrently rather than sequentially. Final inspections and


permits shall be issued within sixty (60) business days of an


application, with any required adjustments communicated to the


faith-based organization within thirty (30) business days.


3. A municipality may not adopt or enforce any code, ordinance,


regulation, standard, stipulation, or other requirement that


establishes, directly or indirectly, any of the following:


a. minimum square footage or dimensional requirements for


housing units within proposed projects,


b. maximum or minimum lot coverage requirements for


proposed projects, and


c. regulations imposing mandatory open space requirements


within a project.


4. The provisions of this act preempt any local zoning


restrictions or ordinances that conflict with such provisions. A


municipality shall not impose any conditions, fees, or discretionary


requirements on projects provided for by the provisions of this act


beyond those the municipality would apply to a comparable project


permitted on a by-right basis.

Req. No. 2761 Page 8


5. A municipality is prohibited from applying targeted


regulations or policies that specifically address projects provided


for under this act in ways that reduce standard zoning allowances,


add regulatory burden, or alter project eligibility. Any local


measures that attempt to override or conflict with the provisions of


this act shall be deemed invalid.


D. 1. An approved project shall be permitted a base density of


seventy-five dwelling units per acre. If the zoning where such


development site is located, or a property adjoining such site,


allows for greater residential density, the project shall be


permitted the greater density.


2. An approved project shall be permitted a height increase of


up to one story or fifteen (15) feet above the maximum height limit


allowed in the zoning where the development site is located. If the


zoning where such site is located, or a property adjoining such


site, allows for greater building height, the project shall be


permitted the greater height.


3. Steeples or other non-inhabitable structures that serve an


aesthetic or decorative use shall be permitted an additional height


allowance of fifteen (15) feet above the maximum height limit


established in paragraph 2 of this subsection.


4. An approved project shall be permitted a base floor area


ratio of two to one (2:1). Projects with areas designated for



Req. No. 2761 Page 9


ancillary use that include an active ground floor shall receive an


additional floor area ratio increase of one-half (1/2).


5. An approved project in which forty percent (40%) or more of


properties designated for residential use contain two or more


bedrooms shall qualify for:


a. a floor area ratio increase of one-half (1/2) greater


than that established in paragraph 4 of this


subsection, and


b. a maximum height limit of up to eleven (11) feet


greater than that established in paragraph 2 of this


subsection.


6. Up to one thousand five hundred (1,500) square feet of


active ground floor space contained within properties for ancillary


use within an approved project shall be exempt from floor area ratio


calculations.


7. An approved project that preserves existing mature trees


located on the development site shall be entitled to a maximum


height limit of up to eleven (11) feet greater than that established


in paragraph 2 of this subsection.


8. An approved project that utilizes public benefit incentives


shall be permitted a maximum floor area ratio of three to one (3:1)


and a maximum height limit of forty-five (45) feet, except in areas


where zoning regulations or municipal standards allow for a greater



Req. No. 2761 Page 10


floor area ratio or maximum height limit. In such case, the project


shall be permitted the greater ratio or limit.


9. No minimum parking requirements shall be imposed on any part


of an approved project designated for either residential or


ancillary use.


10. Any setback requirements implemented by a municipality


shall remain consistent with local zoning regulations on the


development site for an approved project, unless specifically


waived.


E. 1. No project located on a development site that is within


one thousand six hundred (1,600) feet of an area zoned for heavy


industrial uses shall be eligible under the provisions of this act.


2. No project located on a development site in a designated


environmental protection zone, including, but not limited to, a


wetlands, wildlife habitat, or area subject to critical


environmental regulations, shall be eligible under the provisions of


this act.


3. A municipality may subject a development site located


adjacent to critical infrastructure, including, but not limited to,


highways, railroads, or major utility lines, to larger setbacks and


additional restrictions to ensure public safety and infrastructure


maintenance access.





Req. No. 2761 Page 11


F. 1. No additional municipal ordinance or rule from an entity


of this state shall be required to implement the provisions of this


act.


2. The Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency shall monitor compliance


with the provisions of this act and refer instances of noncompliance


by municipalities to the Office of the Attorney General, who shall


be empowered to take necessary actions to ensure compliance with the


provisions of this act.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2761 MSBB 1/12/2026 4:57:16 PM





















Req. No. 2761 Page 12